Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-497.02
Convictions; order of probation; abstract; transmittal required; open for inspection by public.

An abstract of the judgment of conviction or order of probation shall be transmitted to the Director of Motor Vehicles and the National Crime Information Center upon conviction of any person of or placing such person on probation for manslaughter or other felony in the commission of which a vehicle was used. The director and the National Crime Information Center shall keep such conviction reports in their offices, and the reports shall be open to the inspection of any person during reasonable business hours.

Laws 1931, c. 110, § 58, p. 326;

Laws 1941, c. 124, § 9, p. 477;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 39-1189;

R.S.1943, § 39-795;

Laws 1953, c. 219, § 8, p. 772;

Laws 1957, c. 164, § 2, p. 579;

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 16, p. 1256;

Laws 1957, c. 165, § 2, p. 582;

Laws 1969, c. 317, § 2, p. 1144;

Laws 1973, LB 317, § 2;

Laws 1973, LB 226, § 26;

R.S.Supp.,1973, § 39-795;

Laws 1991, LB 420, § 3;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-669.23;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 76.

The determinations required in this and companion sections are simple ministerial matters. Stauffer v. Weedlun, 188 Neb. 105, 195 N.W.2d 218 (1972).

This section applies to certification of conviction by justice of the peace. Bradford v. Ress, 167 Neb. 338, 93 N.W.2d 17 (1958).

Certificate made by judge or clerk of county court is not required to be attested by seal. Strasser v. Ress, 165 Neb. 858, 87 N.W.2d 619 (1958).